Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 6.1 The Interstate Compact for Juveniles
14-6.1-3.
Ratification procedure — Effective date.

When the governor shall have executed the compact on behalf of this state and shall have caused a verified copy to be filed with the secretary of state; and when the compact shall have been ratified by no less than thirty-five (35) of the states, and thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other compacting state upon the enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governor is authorized and directed to take any action that may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents as between this state and any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, ratifying the compact.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 179, § 1.

14-6.1-4.
Compact administrator.

Pursuant to the compact, the governor is authorized and empowered to designate an officer who shall be the compact administrator and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall promulgate rules and regulations to more effectively carry out the terms of the compact. The compact administrator shall serve subject to the pleasure of the governor. The compact administrator is authorized, empowered, and directed to cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of any supplementary agreement or agreements entered into by this state under it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-5.
Supplementary agreements.

The compact administrator is authorized and empowered to enter into supplementary agreements with appropriate officials of other states pursuant to the compact. In the event that a supplementary agreement shall require or contemplate the use of any institution or facility of this state or require or contemplate the provision of any service by this state, the supplementary agreement shall have no force or effect until approved by the head of the department or agency under whose jurisdiction the institution or facility is operated or whose department or agency will be charged with the rendering of the service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-6.
Financial arrangements.

The compact administrator, subject to the approval of the director of administration, may make or arrange for any payments necessary to discharge any financial obligations imposed upon this state by the compact or by any supplementary agreement entered into under it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-7.
Federal and other aid.

Any and all donations, gifts, and grants of money, equipment, and services from the federal or any local government, or any agency of it, and from any person, firm, or corporation, for any of the purposes and functions of the compact, may be accepted by and administered by the compact administrator, subject to the approval of the director of administration, who may receive and utilize the aid, subject to the terms, conditions, and regulations governing donations, gifts and grants.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-8.
Fees.

Any judge of this state who appoints counsel or guardian ad litem pursuant to the provisions of the compact may, in his or her discretion, fix a fee to be paid out of funds available for disposition by the court, but no fee shall exceed the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-9.
Responsibilities of state departments, agencies, and officers.

The courts, departments, agencies, and officers of this state and its subdivisions shall enforce the compact and shall do all things appropriate to the effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their respective jurisdictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-10.
“Delinquent juvenile” defined.

“Delinquent juvenile,” includes a wayward child as defined in chapter 1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

14-6.1-11.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, any sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.